Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.473

Effectiveness of orders.

(1) Unless a later date is stated in an order or a stay is granted, an order is effective when entered, but:

(a) A party may not be required to comply with a final order unless the party has been served with or has actual knowledge of the final order;

(b) A nonparty may not be required to comply with a final order unless the agency has made the final order available for public inspection and copying or the nonparty has actual knowledge of the final order;

(c) For purposes of determining time limits for further administrative procedure or for judicial review, the determinative date is the date of service of the order.

(2) Unless a later date is stated in the initial order or a stay is granted, the time when an initial order becomes a final order in accordance with RCW 34.05.461 is determined as follows:

(a) When the initial order is entered, if administrative review is unavailable; or

(b) When the agency head with such authority enters an order stating, after a petition for administrative review has been filed, that review will not be exercised.

(3) This section does not preclude an agency from taking immediate action to protect the public interest in accordance with RCW 34.05.479.

[ 1989 c 175 s 22; 1988 c 288 s 422.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.